Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1321
Filing prior to December 24, 1986; effect.

An effective financing statement filed prior to December 24, 1986, shall be considered as filed on such date.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 21.

Sections 52-1301 through 52-1321 were not intended to remove regular U.C.C. provisions regarding the creation, perfection, or priority of security interests. Battle Creek State Bank v. Preusker, 253 Neb. 502, 571 N.W.2d 294 (1997).